Maine, session 132, LD146.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-BB, sub-§4, as repealed and replaced by PL 2013, c. 550,
§1 and affected by §2, is amended to read:
4. Maximum credit. The For tax years beginning before January 1, 2025, the credit
allowed pursuant to this section and section 2534 may not exceed the greater of:
A. Five million dollars for the portion of a certified rehabilitation as defined by the
Code, Section 47(c)(2)(C) placed in service in the State in the taxable year; and
B. Five million dollars for each building that is a component of a certified historic
structure for which a credit is claimed under this section.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5219-BB, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Maximum credit; beginning 2025. For tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025, the credit allowed pursuant to this section and section 2534:
A. In the first year in which the credit may be claimed, may not exceed the greater of:
(1) Ten million dollars for the portion of a certified rehabilitation as defined by
the Code, Section 47(c)(2)(C) placed in service in the State in the taxable year; and
(2) Ten million dollars for each building that is a component of a certified historic
structure for which a credit is claimed under this section;
B. In the 2nd year in which the credit may be claimed, may not exceed the greater of:
(1) Ten million dollars minus the credit allowed under paragraph A, subparagraph
(1) for the portion of a certified rehabilitation as defined by the Code, Section
47(c)(2)(C) placed in service in the State in the taxable year; and
(2) Ten million dollars minus the credit allowed under paragraph A, subparagraph
(2) for each building that is a component of a certified historic structure for which
a credit is claimed under this section; and
Page 1 - 132LR0525(03)

C. In the 3rd and subsequent years in which the credit may be claimed, may not exceed
the greater of:
(1) Five million dollars for the portion of a certified rehabilitation as defined by
the Code, Section 47(c)(2)(C) placed in service in the State in the taxable year; and
(2) Five million dollars for each building that is a component of a certified historic
structure for which a credit is claimed under this section.
Page 2 - 132LR0525(03)